District of Columbia statutes.
14-504

Force in District of Columbia of wills probated elsewhere.

A record in the office of the Register of Wills for the District of Columbia of a duly certified copy, or transcript of the record of proceedings, admitting a will or codicil to probate outside of the District of Columbia; and a record in that office of a will or codicil admitted to probate in the District before June 8, 1898, and not annulled or declared void according to law prior to June 8, 1898, shall be deemed and held as of the same force and effect as if the will or codicil had been duly proved and admitted to probate and record pursuant to sections 19-301 to 19-303 [§ 19-303 repealed].

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 14-504.
1973 Ed., § 14-504.

Prior Codifications

Sections 19-301 to 19-303, referred to at the end of this section, were repealed by the Act of September 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 780, Pub. L. 89-183, § 8.

References in Text